Maine, session 132, LD2135.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 37-B MRSA §513-B is enacted to read:
§513-B. Veterans' Housing Provider Incentive Program; establishment; report
The Veterans' Housing Provider Incentive Program is established to provide grants to
organizations to support permanent housing for veteran populations.
1. Fund established. The Veterans' Housing Provider Incentive Fund, referred to in
this section as "the fund," is established under the bureau for the purpose of receiving funds
from state, federal and other sources, including donations from private citizens,
corporations and entities for the purposes of this section.
2. Grants to support permanent housing. The bureau shall use the fund to award
grants to organizations that have been determined by the United States Internal Revenue
Service to be exempt from taxation under the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
Section 501(c)(3) and have as a core program supporting permanent housing for veteran
populations. An organization awarded a grant under this section may use the funding for
housing provider incentives, risk mitigation payments and past rental debt payments for
veterans experiencing homelessness.
3. Rules. The bureau may adopt rules necessary to implement this section, including
requirements for organizations to report on the use of grant funding received under this
section. Rules adopted under this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title
5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
4. Report. The bureau shall submit a report by February 15, 2027, and by February
15th in any year in which a grant is issued, regarding grants awarded to organizations under
this section, including information from the organizations on their use of that funding, to
the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over veterans affairs.
Sec. 2. Transfer; Department of Public Safety, Gambling Control Unit,
Sports Wagering program, Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State
Controller shall transfer $90,000 from the Sports Wagering program, Other Special
Page 1 - 132LR2883(03)

Revenue Funds account in the Department of Public Safety, Gambling Control Unit to the
Veterans' Housing Provider Incentive Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account in the
Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management, Maine Bureau of Veterans'
Services for a grant program to support permanent housing for veteran populations.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT, DEPARTMENT
OF
Veterans' Housing Provider Incentive Fund N570
Initiative: Provides one-time funds to issue grants to eligible organizations to support
permanent housing.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $90,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $90,000
Page 2 - 132LR2883(03)